Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,134.01
School crossing zone; overtaking and passing prohibited; penalty.

It is unlawful for a person operating a motor vehicle to overtake and pass another vehicle in a school crossing zone in which the roadway has only one lane of traffic in each direction. Any person convicted of overtaking and passing another vehicle in a school crossing zone is guilty of a traffic infraction and shall be fined not more than two hundred dollars for the first offense and at least two hundred dollars but not more than four hundred dollars for a second or subsequent offense.

Laws 1997, LB 91, § 5.